Utah statutes.
58-22-301.   License required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of professional engineering, professional structural engineering, or professional land surveying, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-22-305.

(2)  The division shall issue licenses to individuals qualified under the provisions of this chapter in the following classifications:

(a)  professional engineer;

(b)  professional structural engineer; and

(c)  professional land surveyor.

(3)  The division may issue a license in a specific engineering discipline or disciplines as defined by rule by the division in collaboration with the board.

